Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Chapter 15. Elections and Ballots.

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2020 [effective in 2021] changes to certain sections in this chapter, see sec. 1 of 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2.

Editor's notes. —

Section 73, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that amended certain sections in this chapter, provides that “[t]he provisions of this act are independent and severable. If any provision of this act, or the applicability of any provision to any person or circumstance, shall be held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Collateral references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 190-220.

Admissibility of election ballots in quo warranto proceedings. 71 ALR2d 353.

Sec. 15.15.010.
General administrative supervision by director.

The director shall provide general administrative supervision over the conduct of state elections, and may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary for the administration of state elections. The director shall adopt regulations that establish for the broadcasting of notices under AS

15.15.070

the frequency of the broadcasts, appropriate broadcast times, and the locations for the broadcasts. The broadcasting regulations must be reasonably calculated to provide the widest possible exposure of the notices.

History.

(§ 3.01 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 37 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative complaint procedure for violations of the Help America Vote Act of 2002, see 6 AAC 25, art. 2.

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

For election pamphlet, see 6 AAC 25, art. 4.

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

For statewide election districts and election district precincts, see 6 AAC 100.

For House District 10 — Fairbanks/Fort Wainwright, see 6 AAC 110.

For House District 11 — North Pole, see 6 AAC 111.

For House District 30 — Lore/Fairbanks, see 6 AAC 130.

For House District 31 — Huffman/Ocean View, see 6 AAC 131.

Sec. 15.15.020.
Date of general election.

The general election is held on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November in every even numbered year.

History.

(§ 3.02 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.15.025.
Top four nonpartisan open primary.

A voter qualified under AS 15.05 may cast a vote for any candidate for each elective state executive and state and national legislative office, without limitations based on the political party or political group affiliation of either the voter or the candidate.

History.

(§ 20, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as
AS 15.15.005. Renumbered in 2020.

Effective dates. —

Section 20, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2 makes this section effective February 28, 2021.

Sec. 15.15.030.
Preparation of official ballot.

The director shall prepare all official ballots to facilitate fairness, simplicity, and clarity in the voting procedure, to reflect most accurately the intent of the voter, and to expedite the administration of elections. The following directives shall be followed when applicable:

The director shall determine the size of the ballot, the type of print, necessary additional instruction notes to voters, and other similar matters of form not provided by law.

The director shall number ballots in series to ensure simplicity and secrecy and to prevent fraud.

The director shall contract for the preparation of ballots under AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

The director may not include on the ballot, as a part of a candidate’s name, any honorary or assumed title or prefix but may include in the candidate’s name any nickname or familiar form of a proper name of the candidate.

The names of the candidates shall be placed in separate sections on the state general election ballot under the office designation to which they were nominated. If a candidate is registered as affiliated with a political party or political group, the party affiliation, if any, may be designated after the name of the candidate, upon request of the candidate. If a candidate has requested designation as nonpartisan or undeclared, that designation shall be placed after the name of the candidate. If a candidate is not registered as affiliated with a political party or political group and has not requested to be designated as nonpartisan or undeclared, the candidate shall be designated as undeclared. The lieutenant governor and the governor shall be included under the same section. Provision shall be made for voting for write-in candidates within each section. Paper ballots for the state general election shall be printed on white paper.

The names of the candidates for each office shall be set out in the same order on ballots printed for use in each house district. The director shall randomly determine the order of the names of the candidates for state representative for each house district. The director shall rotate the order of placement of the names of candidates for governor, lieutenant governor, United States senator, United States representative, and state senator on the ballot for each house district.

The general election ballot shall be designed with the names of candidates of each political party, and of any independent candidates qualified under AS

15.30.026

, for the office of President and Vice-President of the United States placed in the same section on the ballot rather than the names of electors of President and Vice-President.

The general or special election ballot shall be designed with the title and proposition for any initiative, referendum, or constitutional amendment formulated as prescribed by law and placed on the ballot in the manner prescribed by the director. When placed on the ballot, a state ballot proposition or ballot question shall carry the number that was assigned to the petition for the proposition or question. Provision shall be made for marking the proposition “Yes” or “No.”

The general or special election ballot shall be designed with the question of whether a constitutional convention shall be called placed on the ballot in the following manner: “Shall there be a constitutional convention?” Provision shall be made for marking the question “Yes” or “No.”

A nonpartisan ballot shall be designed for each judicial district in which a justice or judge is seeking retention in office. The ballot shall be divided into four parts. Each part must bear a heading indicating the court to which the candidate is seeking approval, and provision shall be made for marking each question “Yes” or “No.” Within each part, the question of whether the justice or judge shall be approved or rejected shall be set out in substantially the following manner:

“Shall . . . . . . . be retained as justice of the supreme court for 10 years?”;

“Shall . . . . . . . be retained as judge of the court of appeals for eight years?”;

“Shall . . . . . . . be retained as judge of the superior court for six years?”; or

“Shall . . . . . . . be retained as judge of the district court for four years?”

When the legislature by law authorizes a state debt for capital improvements, the director shall place the question of whether the specific authorization shall be ratified by placing the ballot title and question on the next general election ballot, or on the special election ballot if a special election is held for the purpose of ratifying the state debt for capital improvements before the time of the next general election. Unless specifically provided otherwise in the Act authorizing the debt, the ballot title shall, by the use of a few words in a succinct manner, indicate the general subject of the Act. The question shall, by the use of a few sentences in a succinct manner, give a true and impartial summary of the Act authorizing the state debt. The question of whether state debt shall be contracted shall be assigned a letter of the alphabet on the ballot. Provision shall be made for marking the question substantially as follows:

The director may provide for the optical scanning of ballots where the requisite equipment is available.

The director may provide for voting by use of electronically generated ballots by a voter who requests to use a machine that produces electronically generated ballots.

The director shall include the following statement on the ballot:

Instead of the statement provided by (14) of this section, when candidates for President and Vice-President of the United States appear on a general election ballot, the director shall include the following statement on the ballot:

The director shall design the general election ballots so that the candidates are selected by ranked-choice voting.

The director shall design the general election ballot to direct the voter to mark candidates in order of preference and to mark as many choices as the voter wishes, but not to assign the same ranking to more than one candidate for the same office.

“Bonds. . . . . . . Yes” or “Bonds. . . . . . . No,”

followed by an appropriate oval.

A candidate's designated affiliation does not imply that the candidate is nominated or endorsed by the political party or group or that the party or group approves of or associates with that candidate, but only that the candidate is registered as affiliated with the political party or political group.

Click to view

A candidate's designated affiliation does not imply that the candidate is nominated or endorsed by the political party or political group or that the political party or political group approves of or associates with that candidate, but only that the candidate is registered as affiliated with the party or group. The election for President and Vice-President of the United States is different. Some candidates for President and Vice-President are the official nominees of their political party.

Click to view

History.

(§ 3.03 ch 83 SLA 1960; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 125 SLA 1962; am § 6 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1967; am §§ 7, 8 ch 228 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 1969; am § 6 ch 38 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 120 SLA 1975; am § 21 ch 12 SLA 1980; am § 38 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 67 SLA 1989; am § 5 ch 58 SLA 1995; am § 15 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 1998; am § 40 ch 21 SLA 2000; am §§ 13, 14, 92 ch 82 SLA 2000; am §§ 2, 3 ch 6 SLA 2002; am §§ 1, 2 ch 154 SLA 2004; am §§ 11, 12 ch 2 FSSLA 2005; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 2013; §§ 21 and 22, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (13) was enacted as (14).
Renumbered in 1998, at which time former (13) was renumbered as (12) to reflect the 1963 repeal of former (12). Paragraphs (12) and (13), formerly (13) and (14), were again renumbered in 2010 to reflect the 2000 repeal of former paragraph (12).

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 24, 2013, in (2), substituted “ensure” for “assure”; in (3), substituted “shall contract” for “may contract for the preparation of the ballots on a regional basis if necessary and may contract”, substituted “under AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code)” for “without obtaining competitive bids”; in (10), moved “provision shall be made for marking each question ‘Yes’ or ‘No’ ”, from the end of the paragraph to appear following “candidate is seeking approval”; made stylistic and related changes.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (5), in the first sentence, deleted “and their party designations” following “the candidates”, rewrote the second sentence, which read, “The party affiliation, if any, shall be designated after the name of the candidate.”, added the third and fourth sentences, in the sixth sentence deleted “and no-party” following “write-in”; added (14) – (17).

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 2, ch. 58, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to this section are applicable to contracts for the preparation of ballots for elections conducted on or after January 1, 2014.

Sec. 15.15.032.
Use of electronically generated ballots.

If the director provides for voting by use of electronically generated ballots, the director shall provide balloting equipment that would allow voters with disabilities, including those who are blind or visually impaired, to cast private, independent, and verifiable ballots. The director may not provide for more than one machine that produces electronically generated ballots in a precinct or in a regional supervisor’s office, except where the director determines that additional machines are needed to accommodate the needs of individuals with disabilities, including individuals with physical limitations or visual impairments.

Software for voting by use of electronically generated ballots shall be tested and certified under AS

15.20.900

.

The director shall provide for a paper record of each electronically generated ballot that can be

reviewed and corrected by the voter at the time the vote is cast; and

used for a recount of the votes cast at an election in which electronically generated ballots were used.

History.

(§ 3 ch 154 SLA 2004)

Sec. 15.15.035.
Printing of ballots and other material.

The director may not be required to do business with a printing company while the company is involved in a labor dispute.

History.

(§ 9 ch 228 SLA 1968; am § 39 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.15.040.
Preparation of other election materials.

The director shall prescribe the form of and prepare tinted sample ballots and all other materials, forms, and supplies required for the election.

The director shall prepare and issue or make available with each sample ballot for a special election the statement provided for in AS

24.08.037

of the scope of each project included in a proposed general obligation bond issue creating a state debt for capital improvements that is submitted to the electorate for ratification under AS

15.15.030

(11). The statement of scope for each project shall be the same statement included in the authorization bill. When a ballot proposition is submitted to the voters at a primary or a special election, a statement the same as that provided for in the election pamphlet under AS

15.58.020(a)(6)

shall be made available with each sample ballot.

The director shall provide materials, forms, and supplies for each polling place, including information regarding the date of the election and hours the polling place will be open, instructions on how to cast a questioned ballot, instructions for first-time voters who initially registered by mail, general information on voting rights, prohibitions on acts of fraud and misrepresentation, and whom to contact to report violations.

History.

(§ 3.04 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 11 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 16 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1973; am § 16 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 40 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 113 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.15.050.
Distribution of election materials.

The director shall distribute an adequate supply of sample and official ballots and all other materials, forms, and supplies required for the election to the election supervisors for distribution to chairpersons of election boards in precincts not less than 25 days before the date for the election.

History.

(§ 3.05 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 12 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 17 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 41 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “chairpersons” was substituted for “chairmen” in accordance with sec. 95(4), ch. 82, SLA 2000.

Sec. 15.15.060.
Polling places, voting booths, and supplies.

Immediately following the appointment of the election board, the election supervisor in conjunction with the election board chair shall secure polling places for holding the election, suitable ballot boxes that will assure security, and an adequate number of voting booths or screens, national flags, pens, and pencils. At every polling place, at least one voting booth shall be furnished and not less than one voting booth or screen shall be furnished for each 100 votes or fractional part of 100 votes cast in the previous election. At every polling place, at least one-half of the voting booths used shall be not less than six feet in height, enclosed on three sides, and provided with a curtain extending from the top of the voting booth to within approximately 30 inches of the floor. The curtain of the voting booth must conceal the voter while voting. The election supervisor and the election board chair may, in an emergency, secure an alternate location for a polling place.

To assure administrative economy and to protect the secrecy of the ballot, the director may adopt regulations prescribing

the type of polling place for holding the election;

the requirements regarding ballot boxes, voting screens, national flags, and other supplies; and

subject to the specifications of (a) of this section, the requirements regarding voting booths.

The director shall pay the cost of necessary election expenses incurred in securing a place for holding the election, a suitable ballot box, and an adequate number of voting booths, screens, national flags, and other supplies. The national flag shall be displayed over or near the entrance of each polling place.

When the director determines that there is an area in the state where a voter may be confused as to the voter’s correct precinct polling place, the director shall provide each polling place in that area with maps and materials that indicate house district boundaries, precinct boundaries, and polling places.

In each polling place, the director shall require to be posted, in a location conspicuous to a person who will be voting, the following notice, written in bold:

A candidate's designated affiliation does not imply that the candidate is nominated or endorsed by the political party or group or that the party or group approves of or associates with that candidate, but only that the candidate is registered as affiliated with the party or group.

Click to view

History.

(§ 3.06 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 13 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 42 ch 100 SLA 1980; am §§ 6, 7 ch 58 SLA 1995; am § 41 ch 21 SLA 2000; § 23, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, added (e).

Sec. 15.15.070.
Public notice of election required.

The director shall give and is authorized to contract to give full public notice of the election. The director may select a manner reasonably calculated to give actual knowledge of the election to the voters.

The notice shall be given by publication at least twice in one or more newspapers of general circulation in each of the four judicial districts. The printed notice must specifically include the date of election, the hours between which the polling places will be open, the offices to which candidates are to be nominated or elected, and the subject of the propositions and questions that are to be voted on.

Public notice shall also be given by posting notices in those communities that do not have newspapers of general circulation where posting of notice is considered necessary by the director. The posted notice must specifically include the date of election, the location of the polling places, the hours between which the polling places will be open, the offices to which candidates are to be nominated or elected, the subject of the propositions and questions that are to be voted on, and other information considered necessary by the director.

The first publication, broadcast, or posting of the notice shall be made not less than 10 days before the election.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 82 SLA 2000.]

[Repealed, § 15 ch 82 SLA 2000.]

The director shall pay the cost of election expenses incurred in giving notice of an election.

An abbreviated form of the notice published under (b) of this section shall be broadcast on one or more radio or television stations in each of the four judicial districts. The broadcast notice must include at a minimum the date of the election, the hours between which the polling places will be open, and the address and phone number of the election supervisor or supervisors for the judicial district in which the notice is broadcast.

History.

(§ 3.07 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 8 ch 125 SLA 1962; am § 10 ch 228 SLA 1968; am §§ 43 — 46 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 85 SLA 1986; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 74 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 6 SLA 1993; am § 42 ch 21 SLA 2000; am §§ 15 — 17, 92 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

The amendment made by sec. 42, ch. 21, SLA 2000 was not given effect because the amendment made by sec. 15, ch. 82, SLA 2000 superseded it.

Sec. 15.15.080.
Time for opening and closing polls.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, on the day of any election, each election board shall open the polls for voting at seven o’clock in the morning, shall close the polls for voting at eight o’clock in the evening, and shall keep the polls open during the time between these hours. The election board members shall report to the polling place at 6:30 in the morning of an election day.

On the day of any election that is not a general election, a primary election, a special election, or a federal election held under this title, the director shall require each election board to open the polls for voting at eight o’clock in the morning, shall close the polls for voting at eight o’clock in the evening, and shall keep the polls open during the time between these hours. The election board members shall report to the polling place one-half hour before the polls are to open on election day.

History.

(§ 3.08 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 11 ch 228 SLA 1968; am § 18 ch 116 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 2 ch 5 SLA 1984)

Collateral references. —

29 C.J.S., Elections, § 198.

Sec. 15.15.090.
Designation of precinct polling place.

The polling place shall be located within the precinct unless the election supervisor and the election board chairperson determine that a building located in an adjoining precinct is more suitable or convenient to the voters.

History.

(§ 8 ch 38 SLA 1974; am § 47 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “chairperson” was substituted for “chairman” in accordance with sec. 95(3), ch. 82, SLA 2000.

Sec. 15.15.100.
Time off for voting.

A qualified voter who does not have sufficient time outside working hours within which to vote at a state election may, without loss of pay, take off as much working time as will enable voting.
If any employee has two consecutive hours in which to vote, either between the opening of the polls and the beginning of the employee’s regular working shift, or between the end of the regular working shift and the closing of the polls, the employee shall be considered to have sufficient time outside working hours within which to vote.

History.

(§ 3.10 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Cross references. —

For penalty for refusal to allow employees time off to vote, see
AS

15.56.100

.

Sec. 15.15.110.
General duties and oath of election board.

The election board shall supervise the election in the precinct. Before entering upon the duties of office, each election official shall take an oath to honestly, faithfully, and promptly perform the duties of office. Any appointed election official, including an appointed election official who has not personally subscribed to the oath, may administer the oath to another election official. The chairperson of the election board shall rotate the time at which election officials may be relieved for meals.

History.

(§ 3.11 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 19 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 18 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.120.
Filling vacancies in election board.

If an appointed election board member fails to appear and subscribe to the oath on election day or becomes incapacitated during the time of the election or the counting of the ballots, the election board members present shall elect, by a majority voice vote, a qualified voter to fill the vacancy. The qualified voter elected to fill the vacancy shall be of the same political party as the person for whom the substitution is made unless, after reasonable effort, the election board members determine that a qualified voter of the same political party is not available.

History.

(§ 3.12 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 14 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 48 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 19 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.130.
Majority decision of election board.

The decision of the majority of election board members determines the action that the election board shall take regarding any question that arises during the course of the election.

History.

(§ 3.13 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 20 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.140.
Permitted use of unofficial ballots.

If the election board receives an insufficient number of official ballots or official election materials, it shall provide and the voters may use unmarked substitute ballots or other election materials to indicate the intent of the voter.

The election board shall certify the facts which prevented the use of the official ballots and materials and shall include the certificate in the election returns to the director. The initial failure to certify to the facts or include the certificate required does not invalidate any ballots.

On disclosure that unofficial ballots have been used without the certification required under (b) of this section, the director shall notify the chairperson of the election board by telephone or electronic transmission of the failure to certify the ballots properly.

The director may accept a certificate made by electronic transmission and count the ballots if the certificate is proper and actually received by the director within 10 days after the date that the chairperson of the election board was notified under (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 3.14 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 49 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 16 ch 86 SLA 1996; am §§ 21, 22 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.150.
Official opening of polls.

On the day and hour of election, the election board shall announce that the polls are open and receive the voters.

History.

(§ 3.15 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.15.160.
Prohibition of political discussion by election board.

During the hours that the polls are open, an election board member may not discuss any political party, candidate, or issue while on duty.

History.

(§ 3.16 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 23 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.170.
Prohibition of political persuasion near election polls.

During the hours the polls are open, a person who is in the polling place or within 200 feet of any entrance to the polling place may not attempt to persuade a person to vote for or against a candidate, proposition, or question. The election officials shall post warning notices at the required distance in the form and manner prescribed by the director.

History.

(§ 3.17 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 20 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 50 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 24 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.180.
Keeping of register.

The election officials shall keep a register or registers in which each voter before receiving a ballot shall sign the voter’s name and give both a residence and mailing address. A record shall be kept in the registration book in space provided of the names of persons who offer to vote but who actually do not vote, and a brief statement of explanation. The signing of the register constitutes a declaration by the voter that the voter is qualified to vote.

History.

(§ 3.18 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 15 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 9 ch 38 SLA 1974; am § 51 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 25 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.190.
Keeping of duplicate register. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 15.15.180.]

Sec. 15.15.195.
Voters on official registration list.

An election official in a precinct shall allow a voter on the official registration list to vote in the precinct unless the voter is questioned in accordance with AS

15.15.210

.

History.

(§ 52 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 26 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Collateral references. —

Constitutionality of voter participation provisions for primary elections. 120 ALR5th 125.

Sec. 15.15.198.
Voters not on official registration list.

If a voter’s name does not appear on the official registration list in the precinct in which the voter seeks to vote, the election official shall affirmatively advise the voter that the voter may cast a questioned ballot, and the voter shall be allowed to vote a questioned ballot. At the time the voter casts a questioned ballot, the voter shall be given written information stating that the voter will be able to ascertain whether the ballot was counted and, if not counted, the reason the ballot was not counted.

A person whose registration is inactive under AS

15.07.130(b)

and who votes a questioned or absentee ballot shall have the ballot counted if

the person was registered to vote in the last four calendar years;

the person signs a statement to that effect; and

the earlier registration is verified by the director.

History.

(§ 52 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 13 ch 111 SLA 1994; am § 17 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 27 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 11 ch 113 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.15.200.
Questioning of voter of doubtful qualification. [Repealed, § 38 ch 116 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 15.15.210.
Questioning of voters of suspect qualification.

Every election official shall question, and every watcher and any other person qualified to vote in the precinct may question, a person attempting to vote if the questioner has good reason to suspect that the questioned person is not qualified under AS 15.05. All questions regarding a person’s qualifications to vote shall be made in writing setting out the reason the person has been questioned. A questioned person shall, before voting, subscribe to a declaration in a form provided by the director attesting to the fact that in each particular the person meets all the qualifications of a voter, is not disqualified, and has not voted at the same election, and certifying that the person understands that a false statement on the declaration may subject the person to prosecution for a misdemeanor under this title or AS 11. After the questioned person has executed the declaration, the person may vote. If the questioned person refuses to execute the declaration, the person may not vote.

History.

(§ 3.21 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 17 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 22 ch 116 SLA 1972; rp § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980; § 36 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 18 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 28 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.213.
Questioning a voter’s ballot. [Repealed, § 43 ch 85 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 15.15.215.
Disposition of questioned votes.

A voter who casts a questioned ballot shall vote the ballot in the same manner as prescribed for other voters. The voter shall insert the ballot into a secrecy sleeve and put the secrecy sleeve into an envelope on which the statement the voter previously signed is located. The envelope shall be sealed and deposited in the ballot box. When the ballot box is opened, the envelopes shall be segregated, counted, compared to the voting list, and delivered to the official or body supervising the election. The merits of the question shall be determined by this official or body in accordance with the procedure prescribed for questioned votes in AS

15.20.207

.

[Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1968; am § 17 ch 197 SLA 1975; am §§ 55, 231 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 19 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 29 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.220.
Administration of oaths.

Any election official may administer to a voter any oath that is necessary in the administration of the election.

History.

(§ 3.22 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 56 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 30 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.15.225.
Voter identification at polls.

Before being allowed to vote, each voter shall exhibit to an election official one form of identification, including

an official voter registration card, driver’s license, state identification card, current and valid photo identification, birth certificate, passport, or hunting or fishing license; or

an original or a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, government check, or other government document; an item exhibited under this paragraph must show the name and current address of the voter.

An election official may waive the identification requirement if the election official knows the identity of the voter. The identification requirement may not be waived for voters who are first-time voters who initially registered by mail or by facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the director under AS

15.07.050

, and did not provide identification as required in AS

15.07.060

.

A voter who cannot exhibit a required form of identification shall be allowed to vote a questioned ballot.

History.

(§ 57 ch 100 SLA 1980; am §§ 31, 32 ch 82 SLA 2000; am §§ 12, 13 ch 113 SLA 2003)

Sec. 15.15.230.
Providing ballot to voter.

When the voter has qualified to vote, the election official shall give the voter an official ballot. The voter shall retire to a booth or private place to mark the ballot.

History.

(§ 3.23 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 58 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 33 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.240.
Voter assistance.

A qualified voter needing assistance in voting may request an election official, a person, or not more than two persons of the voter’s choice to assist. If the election official is requested, the election official shall assist the voter. If any other person is requested, the person shall state upon oath before the election official that the person will not divulge the vote cast by the person assisted.

History.

(§ 3.24 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 9 ch 125 SLA 1962; am § 59 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 34 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.250.
Disposition of spoiled ballot.

If a voter improperly marks, damages, or otherwise spoils a ballot, the voter may request and the election board shall provide another ballot, with a maximum of three. The board shall record on the precinct register that there was a spoiled ballot and destroy the spoiled ballot immediately without examining it.

History.

(§ 3.25 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 7 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 35 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.260.
Placing ballot in ballot box by voter.

When the voter has marked a ballot, the voter shall inform the election official. The ballot shall be deposited in the ballot box by the voter in the presence of the election official unless the voter requests the election official to deposit the ballot on the voter’s behalf. Separate ballot boxes may be used for separate ballots.

History.

(§ 3.26 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1978; am § 60 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 36 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.15.270.
Leaving polling place with ballot prohibited.

A voter may not leave the polling place with the official ballot that the voter received to mark.

History.

(§ 3.27 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.15.280.
Prohibiting the exhibition of marked ballots.

Subject to AS

15.15.240

a voter may not exhibit the voter’s ballot to an election official or any other person so as to enable any person to ascertain how the voter marked the ballot.

History.

(§ 3.28 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.15.290.
Prohibiting the identification of ballots.

While the polls are open, an election official may not open any ballot received from a voter, or mark a ballot by folding or otherwise so as to be able to recognize it, or otherwise attempt to learn how a voter marked a ballot, or allow the same to be done by another person.

History.

(§ 3.29 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.15.300.
Prohibiting the count of exhibited ballots.

An election official may not allow a ballot to be placed in the ballot box that the official knows to have been unlawfully exhibited by the voter.
A ballot unlawfully exhibited shall be recorded as a spoiled ballot and destroyed.

History.

(§ 3.30 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 61 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.15.310.
Official closing of polls.

Fifteen minutes before and at the time of closing the polls, the election board shall announce the present time and the time of closing the polls.

History.

(§ 3.31 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.15.320.
Voters in line when polls close.

Every qualified voter present and in line at the time prescribed for closing the polls may vote.

History.

(§ 3.32 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.15.330.
Commencement of ballot count.

When the polls are closed and the last vote has been cast in a hand-count precinct, the election board shall immediately proceed to open the ballot box and to count the votes cast. In all cases, the election board shall cause the count to be continued without adjournment until the count is complete.

History.

(§ 3.33 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 14 ch 228 SLA 1968; am § 24 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 62 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 37 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Sec. 15.15.340.
Duties, oath, and vacancies of additional election officials.

Additional election officials shall report to the election board at the polls at the time designated by the election supervisor or the chairperson of the election board to assume their duties to assist the election board in counting the vote. Before undertaking the duties of office, each additional election official shall subscribe to an oath to honestly, faithfully, impartially, and promptly carry out the duties of the position. If an additional election official fails to appear and subscribe to the oath at the time designated by the election supervisor, the election board shall appoint any qualified voter to fill the vacancy.

History.

(§ 3.34 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 15 ch 228 SLA 1968; am § 25 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 63 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 38 ch 82 SLA 2000)